Illinois, session 104th, HB3619.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Keeping Children Safe Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares the following:8        (1) Approximately one in 15 children in the United 9    States is exposed to domestic violence each year.10        (2) Most child abuse in America is perpetrated in the 11    family and by a parent, and intimate partner violence and 12    child abuse overlap in the same families at rates between 13    30% and 60%. A child's risk of abuse increases after a 14    perpetrator of intimate partner violence separates from a 15    domestic partner, even when the perpetrator has not 16    previously directly abused the child. Children in the 17    United States who have witnessed intimate partner violence 18    are approximately 4 times more likely to experience direct 19    child maltreatment than children who have not witnessed 20    intimate partner violence.21        (3) More than 75% of child sexual abuse in America is 22    perpetrated by a family member or a person known to the 23    child. Data from the United States Department of Justice   HB3619- 2 -LRB104 08292 JRC 18343 b1    shows that family members are 49%, or almost one-half, of 2    the perpetrators of crimes against child sex assault 3    victims younger than 6 years of age.4        (4) Research suggests that a child's exposure to an 5    abuser is among the strongest indicators of risk of incest 6    victimization. One national study found that female 7    children with fathers who are abusers of their mothers 8    were 6 and one-half times more likely to experience 9    father-daughter incest than female children who do not 10    have abusive fathers.11        (5) Child abuse is a major public health issue in the 12    United States. Total lifetime financial costs associated 13    with just one year of confirmed cases of child 14    maltreatment, including child physical abuse, sexual 15    abuse, psychological abuse, and neglect, result in 16    $124,000,000,000 in annual costs to the economy of the 17    United States, or approximately 1% of the gross domestic 18    product of the United States.19        (6) On April 13, 2023, the United Nations Special 20    Rapporteur on violence against women and girls called for 21    a ban on highly traumatizing reunification treatments 22    promoted through unlicensed, unregulated, for-profit 23    industries, which result in children being isolated 24    through extended no-contact orders from the other parent, 25    family, friends, schools, and communities.26    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to do the   HB3619- 3 -LRB104 08292 JRC 18343 b1following:2        (1) Increase the priority given to child safety in any 3    State court proceeding that affects or may affect the 4    custody and care of children.5        (2) To prohibit Illinois courts from ordering 6    reunification treatments, programs, or services, 7    including, but not limited to, camps, therapeutic 8    vacations, workshops, and parenting programs, that cut off 9    the relationship with a parent or sequester the child from 10    extended family, friends, and community under acutely 11    distressing circumstances, such as using professional 12    transport agents that force a child into a threat-based, 13    coercive environment to address, repair, or remediate the 14    relationship with the other parent whom the child is 15    rejecting or resisting.16        (3) Ensure that persons involved in cases containing 17    domestic violence or child abuse allegations receive 18    trauma-informed and culturally appropriate training on the 19    dynamics, signs, and impact of domestic violence and child 20    abuse, including child sexual abuse.21        (4) Ensure training is designed to improve the ability 22    of judges and attorneys, court employees involved in 23    family law proceedings covered under this Act, and those 24    persons appointed by a court to assist the court in 25    resolving these family law proceedings to recognize and 26    respond to child abuse, domestic violence, and trauma in   HB3619- 4 -LRB104 08292 JRC 18343 b1    family victims.2        (5) Ensure training that is designed to improve the 3    ability of these persons who perform duties in domestic 4    violence or child custody matters to prioritize children 5    and make appropriate custody decisions in the best 6    interest of child safety and well-being and that are 7    culturally responsive and appropriate for diverse 8    communities.9        (6) Move Illinois toward becoming eligible for 10    additional grant funding through the United States 11    Department of Justice's STOP Violence Against Women 12    Formula Grant Program, as appropriated for states that 13    meet the requirements of the federal Violence Against 14    Women Act Reauthorization Act of 2022 (Division W of 15    Public Law 117-103).16    (c) The General Assembly does not intend, by passage of 17this bill, to discriminate against parents or children based 18on either a parent's or the child's actual or perceived sex, 19gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, 20race, color, ancestry, national origin, ethnic group 21identification, age, religion, marital or parental status, 22physical or mental disability or genetic information, or 23association with a person or group with one or more of these 24actual or perceived characteristics. 25    Section 10. Certain reunification efforts prohibited.   HB3619- 5 -LRB104 08292 JRC 18343 b1    (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a court may not order 2family reunification treatments, programs, or services, 3including, but not limited to, camps, workshops, therapeutic 4vacations, or educational programs, that, as a condition of 5enrollment or participation, require or result in any of the 6following:7        (1) A no contact order.8        (2) An overnight, out-of-state, or multiday stay.9        (3) A transfer of physical or legal custody of the 10    child.11        (4) The use of private youth transporters or private 12    transportation agents engaged in the use of force, threat 13    of force, physical obstruction, acutely distressing 14    circumstances, or circumstances that place the safety of 15    the child at risk.16        (5) The use of threats of physical force, undue 17    coercion, verbal abuse, isolation from the child's family, 18    community, or other sources of support, or other acutely 19    distressing circumstances.20    (b) This Section applies to any proceeding involving the 21support, custody, visitation, allocation of parental 22responsibilities, education, parentage, property interest, or 23general welfare of a child.24    (c) This Section does not affect the authority granted to 25the courts and the Department of Children and Family Services 26under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.   HB3619- 6 -LRB104 08292 JRC 18343 b1    Section 15. Training of court personnel. 2    (a) The Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts is 3encouraged and authorized to establish judicial training 4programs for individuals who perform duties in domestic 5violence or child custody matters, including, but not limited 6to, judges, attorneys, court personnel who are assigned to or 7working in cases involving domestic violence or child custody 8matters, and any person employed by the court or attorneys who 9perform duties in domestic violence or child custody matters 10to include, but not be limited to, guardians ad litem, custody 11evaluators, mediators, expert witnesses in these matters, 12child custody recommending counselors, and others who are 13deemed appropriate by the Administrative Office of the 14Illinois Courts.15    (b)(1) The training program described in this Section 16shall be an ongoing training and education program designed to 17improve the ability of courts to recognize and respond to 18child physical abuse, child sexual abuse, domestic violence, 19and trauma in family victims, particularly children, and to 20make appropriate custody decisions that prioritize child 21safety and well-being and are culturally sensitive and 22appropriate for diverse communities.23    (2) The training program described in this Section shall 24include a domestic violence session in any orientation session 25conducted for newly appointed or elected judges, an annual   HB3619- 7 -LRB104 08292 JRC 18343 b1training session on domestic violence, and periodic updates in 2all aspects of domestic violence, including, but not limited 3to:4            (A) Child sexual abuse.5            (B) Physical abuse.6            (C) Emotional abuse.7            (D) Coercive control.8            (E) Implicit and explicit bias related to parties 9        involved in domestic violence cases.10            (F) Trauma.11            (G) Long-term and short-term impacts of domestic 12        violence and child abuse on children.13            (H) The detriment to children of residing with a 14        person who perpetrates domestic violence.15            (I) That domestic violence can occur without a 16        party seeking or obtaining a restraining order, 17        without a substantiated finding by a child protective 18        service of abuse, or without other documented evidence 19        of abuse.20            (J) Victim and perpetrator behavioral patterns and 21        relationship dynamics within the cycle of violence. 22    Section 20. Judicial reporting of training.23    (a) The Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts must 24report to the General Assembly and the relevant policy 25committees, on or before January 1, 2027, and each January   HB3619- 8 -LRB104 08292 JRC 18343 b1thereafter, on the trainings for judges and other personnel as 2required under this Section. The report must include both of 3the following:4        (1) The titles of the training courses being offered.5        (2) The number of judges and other court personnel 6    that participated in each training.7        (3) The nature and extent of the training.8        (4) The length of the training.9        (5) Any other documentation regarding the training, 10    implementation, and feedback of the training.